Utah statutes.
61-2c-506.   Insufficient funds to satisfy judgment -- Procedure and interest.

If the money deposited in the fund and allotted for satisfying judgments against licensees is insufficient to satisfy an authorized claim for payment, the division shall, when sufficient money has been deposited in the fund, satisfy the unpaid claims in the order they originally were filed, together with accumulated interest at the rate allowable on judgments under Section 15-1-4.



Enacted by Chapter 297, 2004 General Session

